output.aff
SFX U N 34
SFX U   a           u          a
SFX U   a           ou         a
SFX U   a           ami        a
SFX U   ca          c          aca
SFX U   ica         ic         ica
SFX U   ula         ul         ula
SFX U   a           i          ia
SFX U   a           am         ia
SFX U   a           ach        ia
SFX U   da          de         da
SFX U   da          di         da
SFX U   da          di         da
SFX U   da          diam       da
SFX U   da          diach      da
SFX U   la          le         la
SFX U   la          li         la
SFX U   la          lam        [aeiouy]la
SFX U   la          liam       [^aeiouy]la
SFX U   la          lach       [aeiouy]la
SFX U   la          liach      [^aeiouy]la
SFX U   ina         in         ina
SFX U   yna         yn         yna
SFX U   na          ne         na
SFX U   na          ni         na
SFX U   na          niam       na
SFX U   na          niach      na
SFX U   ta          te         ta
SFX U   ta          ti         ta
SFX U   ta          tiam       ta
SFX U   ta          tiach      ta
SFX U   a           e          [^dtnl]a
SFX U   a           i          [^dtnl]a
SFX U   a           iam        [^dtnli]a
SFX U   a           iach       [^dtnli]a

SFX D N 86
SFX D   ec          ce         ec
SFX D   ec          ci         ec
SFX D   ec          ci         ec
SFX D   ec          ciam       ec
SFX D   ec          ciach      ec
SFX D   ec          cou        ec
SFX D   ec          cami       ec
SFX D   d           de         d
SFX D   d           di         d
SFX D   d           di         d
SFX D   d           diam       d
SFX D   d           diach      d
SFX D   0           ou         d
SFX D   0           ami        d
SFX D   0           am         j
SFX D   0           ach        j
SFX D   el          le         sel
SFX D   el          li         sel
SFX D   el          li         sel
SFX D   el          liam       sel
SFX D   el          liach      sel
SFX D   el          lou        sel
SFX D   el          lami       sel
SFX D   l           le         [^s]el
SFX D   l           li         [^s]el
SFX D   l           li         [^s]el
SFX D   l           liam       [^s]el
SFX D   l           liach      [^s]el
SFX D   0           ou         [^s]el
SFX D   0           ami        [^s]el
SFX D   en          ne         [bdhrzv]en
SFX D   en          ni         [bdhrzv]en
SFX D   en          ni         [bdhrzv]en
SFX D   en          niam       [bdhrzv]en
SFX D   en          niach      [bdhrzv]en
SFX D   en          nou        [bdhrzv]en
SFX D   en          nami       [bdhrzv]en
SFX D   en          ne         a[ls]en
SFX D   en          ni         a[ls]en
SFX D   en          ni         a[ls]en
SFX D   en          niam       a[ls]en
SFX D   en          niach      a[ls]en
SFX D   en          nou        a[ls]en
SFX D   en          nami       a[ls]en
SFX D   en          ne         i[aeu].en
SFX D   en          ni         i[aeu].en
SFX D   en          ni         i[aeu].en
SFX D   en          niam       i[aeu].en
SFX D   en          niach      i[aeu].en
SFX D   en          nou        i[aeu].en
SFX D   en          nami       i[aeu].en
SFX D   n           ne         [^a][ls]en
SFX D   n           ni         [^a][ls]en
SFX D   n           ni         [^a][ls]en
SFX D   n           niam       [^a][ls]en
SFX D   n           niach      [^a][ls]en
SFX D   n           nou        [^a][ls]en
SFX D   n           nami       [^a][ls]en
SFX D   n           ne         [^bdhlrsszv]en
SFX D   n           ni         [^bdhlrsszv]en
SFX D   n           ni         [^bdhlrsszv]en
SFX D   n           niam       [^bdhlrsszv]en
SFX D   n           niach      [^bdhlrsszv]en
SFX D   n           nou        [^bdhlrsszv]en
SFX D   n           nami       [^bdhlrsszv]en
SFX D   n           ne         [^e]n
SFX D   n           ni         [^e]n
SFX D   n           ni         [^e]n
SFX D   n           niam       [^e]n
SFX D   n           niach      [^e]n
SFX D   n           nou        [^e]n
SFX D   n           nami       [^e]n
SFX D   t           te         t
SFX D   t           ti         t
SFX D   t           ti         t
SFX D   t           tiam       t
SFX D   t           tiach      t
SFX D   0           ou         t
SFX D   0           ami        t
SFX D   0           e          [^acdlnt]
SFX D   0           i          [^acdlnt]
SFX D   0           i          [^acdlnt]
SFX D   0           iam        [^acdjlnt]
SFX D   0           iach       [^acdjlnt]
SFX D   0           ou         [^acdlnt]
SFX D   0           ami        [^acdlnt]

SFX K Y 30
SFX K   a           e          a
SFX K   a           ej         a
SFX K   a           am         a
SFX K   a           u          a
SFX K   a           ach        a
SFX K   a           ou         a
SFX K   a           ami        a
SFX K   ina         in         ina
SFX K   d           di         d
SFX K   d           di         d
SFX K   d           diam       d
SFX K   d           diach      d
SFX K   l           li         l
SFX K   l           li         l
SFX K   l           liam       l
SFX K   l           liach      l
SFX K   t           ti         t
SFX K   t           ti         t
SFX K   t           tiam       t
SFX K   t           tiach      t
SFX K   n           ni         n
SFX K   n           ni         n
SFX K   n           niam       n
SFX K   n           niach      n
SFX K   0           i          [^adtnl]
SFX K   0           i          [^adtnl]
SFX K   0           iam        [^adtnl]
SFX K   0           iach       [^adtnl]
SFX K   0           ou         [^a]
SFX K   0           ami        [^a]
