output.dic
abstrakcia/U
adoptacia/U
afiliacia/U
aforickost/K
agresia/U
aklamacia/U
akost/K
aktivacia/U
alergia/U
almazia/U
alternativnost/K
ambulancia/U
analogia/U
anarchickost/K
anesteziologia/U
antepozicia/U
apelacia/U
apriornost/K
arbitraz/D
argumentacia/U
artikulacia/U
asonancia/U
aspiracia/U
atraktivnost/K
Aurelia/U
autonomia/U
babica/U
bagaz/D
bachratost/K
bakteria/U
baliaren/D
bandaz/D
bazen/D
bazantnica/U
bedac/D
belost/K
besemeracia/U
betonaren/D
bezcielnost/K
bezchybnost/K
beznadejnost/K
bezpartajnost/K
bezprikladnost/K
beztrestnost/K
bezveternost/K
bezvyslednost/K
bieliaren/D
bigotnost/K
biografia/U
blahosklonnost/K
blamaz/D
bluznivost/K
bobula/U
bojazlivost/K
bradavica/U
brannost/K
briketaren/D
brokolica/U
bryndziaren/D
buclatost/K
bukvica/U
butlavost/K
cedula/U
celostnost/K
cementaren/D
cieluprimeranost/K
ciena/U
civilizacia/U
clivost/K
cudzokrajnost/K
cukraren/D
casovost/K
castica/U
celad/D
cepel/D
cern/D
cernula/U
cervac/D
cest/K
ciertaz/D
citaren/D
clankovanost/K
dacia/U
danost/K
darkyna/D
decentnost/K
decentralizacia/U
deformacia/U
dechtaren/D
deklamacia/U
deklamacnost/K
delegacia/U
demografia/U
demokratickost/K
demontaz/D
dendrologia/U
depolarizacia/U
dermatologia/U
deskriptivnost/K
devalorizacia/U
dezinformacia/U
dezorientovanost/K
diakonia/U
diferencia/U
dilatacia/U
disharmonickost/K
disjunkcia/U
dispozicia/U
diverzifikacia/U
dlan/D
dlhost/K
dobroprajnost/K
dochvilnost/K
dokladnost/K
Domica/U
doraznost/K
dotieravost/K
dotlac/D
dracica/U
dramatickost/K
dren/D
drien/D
drobivost/K
drumbla/U
druznost/K
dusikaren/D
dusivost/K
dvojfazovost/K
dvojsmernost/K
dynamickost/K
dynastia/U
egalizacia/U
ekvivalencia/U
ekvivalentnost/K
elektraren/D
emancipacia/U
empiria/U
energickost/K
entropia/U
ergonomia/U
eskamotaz/D
etnografia/U
eutanazia/U
evidentnost/K
excerpcia/U
exkurzia/U
explicitnost/K
extrakcia/U
extrovertnost/K
falos/D
familia/U
fantazijnost/K
farbotlac/D
federacia/U
fesnost/K
filantropia/U
fixacia/U
folia/U
forsna/U
fotogenickost/K
fotochemikalia/U
fotomontaz/D
fotosutaz/D
fujavica/U
fundamentalnost/K
fyziognomia/U
galvanizovna/U
garaz/D
Gdynia/U
genetickost/K
glykemia/U
gombickaren/D
gramaz/D
gramblavost/K
gumaren/D
gynekologia/U
hadavost/K
Halic/D
hat/D
hebkost/K
hierarchia/U
hladiaren/D
hlasnost/K
hlbkotlac/D
hloh/D
hmatatelnost/K
hodnotnost/K
holen/D
homofonia/U
horlivost/K
hranica/U
hravost/K
hriesnost/K
hrud/D
humannost/K
hvezdaren/D
hybridnost/K
hydroelektraren/D
hydrogeologia/U
chatrc/D
chemikalia/U
chladivost/K
chlebaren/D
chorobnost/K
chrobac/D
chumelica/U
chutnost/K
iluzia/U
impulzivnost/K
inauguracia/U
informatizacia/U
inovacia/U
intelektualizacia/U
intelektualnost/K
intonacia/U
ionometria/U
jablon/D
jarmocnica/U
jarost/K
jedalen/D
junac/D
kaca/U
kaciciaren/D
kajucnost/K
kaliaren/D
kaluz/U
kamuflaz/D
kapsula/U
kartonaz/D
kategoria/U
kazen/D
klenotnica/U
kocikaren/D
koincidencia/U
koksaren/D
kolaz/D
kolomaz/D
Kolumbia/U
komutacia/U
konfuzia/U
koniaren/D
konstitucia/U
kontradiktornost/K
konzekvencia/U
konzervaren/D
korepeticia/U
kostrc/D
kotlaren/D
kozlica/U
kralikaren/D
krivica/U
krivoprisaznost/K
kumulacia/U
kvasiaren/D
labut/D
lahkomyselnost/K
lahodkaren/D
lalia/U
lan/D
lejavica/U
liahen/D
licitacia/U
listaren/D
lod/D
lojalnost/K
lokalizacia/U
loz/DK
lyza/U
lyziaren/D
makovica/U
malomyselnost/K
marhulovica/U
masliaren/D
matez/D
matica/U
melodia/U
meniaren/D
miernost/K
migracia/U
minutaz/D
mizantropia/U
mlad/D
mliekaren/D
mnohovravnost/K
mokrad/D
monstrancia/U
mosadz/D
mraziaren/D
mudrost/K
municia/U
mysel/D
nadrz/D
naliehavost/K
Namibia/U
napln/D
navest/K
nedobizen/D
nehanebnost/K
nemocnica/U
neter/D
neucast/K
nezbednica/U
niz/D
nudza/U
nutnost/K
obec/D
obliekaren/D
obtiaz/D
obycaj/DJ
odbornost/KN
odnoz/D
odporkyna/U
odpoved/D
okolnost/K
onkologia/U
opustenost/K
ornitologia/U
osobnost/K
osiparen/D
ovca/U
palacinkaren/D
panelaren/D
paprad/D
papuca/U
paralelnost/K
parketaren/D
past/D
patalia/U
pec/D
pecivaren/D
penzia/U
pevnost/K
piad/D
pieskovna/U
pivaren/D
plantaz/D
platna/U
plavaren/D
plesen/D
pletiaren/D
plt/D
plynaren/D
pobrusnica/U
pocest/K
podruznost/K
podsiet/D
pochlebovacnost/K
polarografia/U
polnoc/K
polotvar/D
polymerizacia/U
pominutelnost/K
poplatnost/K
poruchovost/K
poslucharen/D
postruhen/D
potencia/U
povercivost/K
povoden/D
poziven/D
praceneschopnost/K
pramat/D
pramica/U
pravost/KN
praziaren/D
predsien/D
preduchovnenost/K
preglejkaren/D
premia/U
prepojenost/K
prestiz/D
prevadzkaren/D
prezamestnanost/K
priazen/DN
priehladnost/K
prietrz/D
prikrost/K
prilbica/U
pristupnost/K
pritaz/D
projekcia/U
promptnost/K
provizornost/K
prozodia/U
prvotlac/D
pust/D
radiologia/U
rapavost/K
rapotana/U
raz/D
recitacia/U
rehola/U
relaxacia/U
religioznost/K
reportaz/D
restitucia/U
retus/D
riasnica/U
romantickost/K
rozdielnost/K
rozhodca/U
rozkos/D
rozmanitost/K
rozpacitost/K
roztrasenost/K
rozzurenost/K
ruban/D
rychlocistiaren/D
sadza/U
sadziaren/D
samolubost/K
samospust/D
sebeckost/K
sec/D
sedimentacia/U
schizofrenia/U
schopnost/KN
siet/D
sklaren/D
sklovitost/K
sklznica/U
skruz/D
slabikotvornost/K
slobodaren/D
slobodomyselnost/K
snemovna/U
snet/D
sobasnost/K
sodovkaren/D
sondaz/D
spalovna/U
spevnost/K
splet/D
spoluzodpovednost/K
spras/D
spupnost/K
spust/D
stagnacia/U
starovekost/K
strakula/U
stran/D
strapenost/K
striharen/D
strojaren/D
strucnost/K
stupaj/D
stupnica/U
sugestivnost/K
suloz/D
sustavnost/K
sustruhovna/U
susiaren/D
svatokradez/D
svetloplachost/K
svojvolnost/K
synonymia/U
syparen/D
sablonovitost/K
samotaren/D
sed/D
sija/U
skodoradost/K
slapaj/D
spargla/U
specifickost/K
stafaz/D
stolna/U
strkovitost/K
tabula/U
taharen/D
Tana/K
taznica/U
teliaren/D
temperamentnost/K
tenzia/U
tiaz/D
tiraz/D
tkanica/U
tlaciaren/D
tonaz/D
torzovitost/K
transakcia/U
treparen/D
tretica/U
trikotaz/D
trivialnost/K
trvacnost/K
tuzkaren/D
tvorkyna/U
ubolenost/K
uctaren/D
uhladnost/K
ulisnica/U
unahlenost/K
upornost/K
uroven/D
usilovnost/K
ustretovost/K
utopia/U
utulnost/K
uzitocnost/KN
vasen/D
vdovica/U
vedomost/KN
verifikacia/U
vetchost/K
viazaren/D
vinovica/U
vlaknitost/K
vodaren/D
vrahyna/U
vravnost/K
vsimavost/K
vyhranenost/K
vynimocnost/K
vypln/D
vyrobna/U
vysmesnost/K
vyumelkovanost/K
vyzbroj/D
vzdusnost/K
zadrapcivost/K
zakladna/U
zakonnost/K
zamoznost/K
zarmutenost/K
zasobaren/D
zast/K
zaziadanost/K
zbroj/D
zdravica/U
zemitost/K
zimozelen/D
zjednodusenost/K
zmennost/K
zmrzlinaren/D
znesitelnost/K
zrenica/U
zretelnost/K
zuzenost/K
zvodnost/K
zalobnica/U
zenskost/K
zivotaschopnost/K
zizen/D
zrebiaren/D
